Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-406
Office of Juvenile Services; individualized treatment plan; case classification and management; requirements.

The Office of Juvenile Services shall utilize:

(1) Evidence-based and validated risk and needs assessment instruments for use in determining the individualized treatment plan for each juvenile committed to the office;

(2) A case classification process to include levels of treatment defined by rules and regulations and case management standards for each level of treatment;

(3) Case management for all juveniles committed to the office; and

(4) A management information system. The system shall be a unified, interdepartmental client information system which supports the management function as well as the service function.

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 15;

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 1141, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 229;

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 83-925.07;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 38;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 28;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 5.